04_Morphology/kw.twol
Alphabet

A I U CH H K L LL M N Ñ P Q R S T U W Y

a i u ch h k l ll m n ñ p q r s t u w y

%{rin%}:n
%{rin%}:rin
%{nin%}:n
%{nin%}:nin
%{k%}:0
;

Sets
Vow = a i u
A I U ;

Rules

"Remove the morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Surface [n] in transitive affix after a vowel"
%{rin%}:n <=> Vow: %>: _ ;

"Surface [n] in comitative affix after a vowel"
%{nin%}:n <=> Vow: %>: _ ;

"Surface [n] in transitive affix after a vowel"
%{k%}:0 <=> Vow: %>: _ ;
